Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.068

Federal employer incentive program—Authority to participate.

The authority may participate as an employer-sponsored program established in section 1860D-22 of the medicare prescription drug, improvement, and modernization act of 2003, P.L. 108-173 et seq., to receive federal employer subsidy funds for continuing to provide retired employee health coverage, including a pharmacy benefit. The director, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall evaluate participation in the employer incentive program, including but not limited to any necessary program changes to meet the eligibility requirements that employer-sponsored retiree health coverage provide prescription drug coverage at least equal to the actuarial value of standard prescription drug coverage under medicare part D. Any employer subsidy moneys received from participation in the federal employer incentive program shall be deposited in the state general fund.

[ 2023 c 51 s 12; 2009 c 479 s 25; 2005 c 195 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Effective date—2005 c 195: See note following RCW 41.05.065.